Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 6. Partner's Dissociation

Property sold after dissolution of partnership. —

Partners were entitled to a share of the profits realized on the sale of property where although the property was sold after dissolution of the partnership, the profits realized were the result of an increase in the value of a partnership asset. Lutz v. Schmillen, 899 P.2d 861,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995), (decided under former § 17-13-614).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d Partnership §§ 808 to 961.

Right of partner accountable for profits earned subsequent to dissolution to compensation for services by way of setoff against former partner, 55 ALR2d 1391.

68 C.J.S. Partnership §§ 302 to 335.

§ 17-21-601.
Events causing partner's dissociation.

A partner is dissociated from a partnership upon:

Receipt by the partnership of notice of the partner’s express will to withdraw as a partner or upon any later date specified in the notice;

An event agreed to in the partnership agreement as causing the partner’s dissociation;

The partner’s expulsion pursuant to the partnership agreement;

The partner’s expulsion by the unanimous vote of the other partners if:

It is unlawful to carry on the partnership business with that partner;

There has been a transfer of all or substantially all of that partner’s transferable interest in the partnership, other than a transfer for security purposes or a court order charging the partner’s interest which has not been foreclosed;

Within ninety (90) days after the partnership notifies a corporate partner that it will be expelled because it has filed a certificate of dissolution or the equivalent, its charter has been revoked or its right to conduct business has been suspended by the jurisdiction of its incorporation, there is no revocation of the certificate of dissolution or no reinstatement of its charter or its right to conduct business; or

A partnership that is a partner has been dissolved and its business is being wound up.

On application by the partnership or another partner, the partner’s expulsion by judicial decree because:

The partner engaged in wrongful conduct that adversely and materially affected the partnership business;

The partner willfully or persistently committed a material breach of the partnership agreement or of a duty owed to the partnership or the other partners under W.S.

17-21-404

; or

The partner engaged in conduct relating to the partnership business which makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in partnership with that partner.

The partner’s:

Becoming a debtor in bankruptcy;

Executing an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

Seeking, consenting to or acquiescing in the appointment of a trustee, receiver or liquidator of that partner or of all or substantially all of that partner’s property; or

Failing within ninety (90) days after the appointment, to have vacated or stayed the appointment of a trustee, receiver or liquidator of the partner or of all or substantially all of the partner’s property obtained without the partner’s consent or acquiescence, or failing within ninety (90) days after the expiration of a stay to have the appointment vacated.

In the case of a partner who is an individual:

The partner’s death;

The appointment of a guardian or general conservator for the partner; or

A judicial determination that the partner has otherwise become incapable of performing the partner’s duties under the partnership agreement.

In the case of a partner that is a trust or is acting as a partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, distribution of the trust’s entire transferable interest in the partnership, but not merely the substitution of a successor trustee;

In the case of a partner that is an estate or is acting as a partner by virtue of being a personal representative of an estate, distribution of the estate’s entire transferable interest in the partnership, but not merely the substitution of a successor personal representative; or

Termination of a partner who is not an individual, partnership, corporation, trust or estate.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applied

in

Warnick v. Warnick, 2003 WY 113, 76 P.3d 316,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 17-21-602.
Partner's wrongful dissociation.

A partner’s dissociation is wrongful only if:

It is in breach of an express provision of the partnership agreement; or

In the case of a partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking, before the expiration of the term or the completion of the undertaking:

The partner withdraws by express will, unless the withdrawal follows the dissociation of another partner and results in a right to dissolve the partnership under W.S. 17-21-801(a)(ii)(A);

The partner is expelled by judicial decree under W.S.

17-21-601

; or

In case of a partner who is not an individual, trust other than a business trust or estate, the partner is expelled or otherwise dissociated because it willfully dissolved or terminated.

A partner who wrongfully dissociates is liable to the partnership and to the other partners for damages caused by the dissociation. That liability is in addition to any other liability of the partner to the partnership or to the other partners.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

§ 17-21-603.
Effect of partner's dissociation.

A dissociated partner’s interest in the partnership shall be purchased pursuant to article 7 of this chapter unless the partner’s dissociation results in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business under article 8 of this chapter.

Upon a partner’s dissociation, that partner’s right to participate in the management and conduct of the partnership business is terminated, except as provided in W.S.

17-21-804

, and that partner’s duties under:

W.S. 17-21-404(b)(i) and (ii) and (d) continue only with regard to matters or events that occurred before the dissociation; and

W.S. 17-21-404(b)(iii) terminate.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

“Terminated” means when affairs wound up. —

The word “terminated” actually means the point in time when all the partnership affairs are wound up. Thickman v. Schunk, 391 P.2d 939,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1964) (decided under former § 17-13-602).

Power of partner on dissolution to collect obligations due partnership. —

In the absence of any agreement to the contrary, on dissolution of a partnership a partner has the power of the partnership under this section in collecting and enforcing obligations due to it. Larsen v. Sjogren, 67 Wyo. 447, 226 P.2d 177,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1951) (decided under former § 17-13-602).

Partnership may maintain suit on dissolution. —

In connection with the enforcement of the rights of a partnership under this section, the partnership may maintain a suit whenever that is necessary. Larsen v. Sjogren, 67 Wyo. 447, 226 P.2d 177,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1951) (decided under former § 17-13-602).

Exercise of option incidental to winding up partnership affairs. —

The exercise of a right to purchase property under lease by virtue of an option contained in the lease was held to be incidental to the ultimate winding up of partnership affairs under this section. Larsen v. Sjogren, 67 Wyo. 447, 226 P.2d 177,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1951) (decided under former § 17-13-602).

Mortgaging property. —

A surviving partner may mortgage partnership property for the purpose of paying partnership debts, as it is his duty to wind up the affairs of the partnership. State Bank v. Bagley Bros., 44 Wyo. 303, 11 P.2d 590,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1932) (decided under former § 17-13-605).

Applied

in

Warnick v. Warnick, 2003 WY 113, 76 P.3d 316,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2003).